Vermont, session 2025-2026, S115.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4256 is amended to read:
§ 4256. OVERDOSE PREVENTION CENTERS
* * *
(f) An overdose prevention center shall not operate within a municipality
unless the legislative body of the municipality by majority vote approves the
operation of overdose prevention centers in the municipality. For purposes of
this subsection, “municipality” means a city or town.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #381120 v.1